tr: Yüzen yem stili: Kıvırcık/kıvrık kuyruk; Glide bait; Sert/yumuşak hibrit; Eklemli sert gövde; İçten misinalı; Kürek kuyruk; Sıçan/fare; Robotik; Su üstü pervaneli; Wake bait; Diğer
fr: Type de swimbait: Queue en faucille; Glide bait; Hybride dur/souple; Corps dur articulé; Line-thru; Paddle tail; Rat/souris; Robotique; Hélice de surface; Wake bait; Autre
vi: Kiểu mồi giả: Đuôi xoăn; Mồi lướt; Lai cứng/mềm; Thân cứng có khớp nối; Dây xuyên thân (Line-thru); Đuôi dẹt (Paddle tail); Chuột; Robot; Chân vịt mặt nước; Mồi tạo sóng; Khác
en: Swimbait style: Curly/curl tail; Glide bait; Hybrid hard/soft; Jointed hard body; Line-thru; Paddle tail; Rat/mouse; Robotic; Topwater prop; Wake bait; Other
sl-SI: Stil varljive ribice: Zavit rep; Drsna vaba (glide bait); Hibridna trda/mehka; Členjeno trdo telo; Line-thru; Rep v obliki vesla; Podgana/miš; Robotska; Površinska vaba s propelerjem; Površinska vaba (wake bait); Drugo
bg-BG: Стил на изкуствена стръв тип „свимбей“: С извита опашка; Глайдър; Хибридна (твърда/мека); Съчленено твърдо тяло; С преминаващо влакно (Line-thru); С плоска опашка (Paddle tail); Плъх/мишка; Роботизирана; Повърхностна с пропелер; Уейкбейт; Друго
hu: Gumihal stílusa: Twisterfarkú; Glide bait; Hibrid kemény/lágy; Többrészes kemény test; Zsinóron átfűzött (line-thru); Korongfarkú; Patkány / egér; Robotikus; Vízfelszíni propelleres; Wake bait; Egyéb
cs: Styl plavky: S krouceným ocáskem; Glide bait; Hybridní tvrdé/měkké; Členěné s tvrdým tělíčkem; Průběžné (line-thru); S kopýtkovým ocáskem; Krysa/myš; Robotické; Hladinové s vrtulkou; Wake bait; Jiné
ro-RO: Stilul nălucii: Coadă ondulată; Nălucă glisantă; Hibrid dur/moale; Corp dur articulat; Line-thru; Coadă tip paletă; Șobolan/șoarece; Robotic; Elice la suprafață; Nălucă tip wake; Altele
es: Estilo de señuelo: Cola rizada; Señuelo deslizante; Híbrido duro/blando; Cuerpo duro articulado; Line-thru; Cola de pala; Rata/ratón; Robótico; Hélice de superficie; Señuelo de estela; Otro
ja: スイムベイトスタイル: カーリーテール; グライドベイト; ハイブリッド (ハード/ソフト); ジョイントハードボディ; ラインスルー; パドルテール; ラット/マウス; ロボット型; トップウォータープロップ; ウェイクベイト; その他
pl: Styl swimbait: Z zakręconym ogonkiem (curly tail); Glide bait; Hybrydowa (twardo-miękka); Twarda, wieloczęściowa (łamana); Line-thru (przelotowa); Kopyto (paddle tail); Szczur/mysz; Robotyczna; Powierzchniowa ze śmigiełkiem (propbait); Wake bait (smugowa); Inna
pt-PT: Estilo da isca de pesca: Cauda enrolada/encaracolada; Glide bait; Híbrido duro/macio; Corpo duro articulado; Fio passante; Cauda de remo; Rato/camundongo; Robótico; Hélice de superfície; Wake bait; Outro
fi: Uintivieheen tyyli: Kiemurapyrstö; Liukuviehe; Kovan/pehmeän hybridi; Nivelletty kova runko; Läpivientimalli; Lapiopyrstö; Rotta/hiiri; Robotti; Pintapotkuri; Vanaviehe; Muu
zh-CN: 仿生鱼饵样式: 卷尾; 滑行路亚; 软硬结合型; 多节硬体; 穿线型; 桨尾; 老鼠型; 机器型; 螺旋桨水面型; 尾波路亚; 其他
ko: 스윔베이트 형태: 컬리/컬 테일; 글라이드 베이트; 하이브리드 하드/소프트; 조인트 하드 바디; 라인스루; 패들 테일; 랫/마우스; 로봇; 탑워터 프롭; 웨이크 베이트; 기타
da: Swimbait-stil: Krøllet/krølhale; Glide-bait; Hybrid hård/blød; Delt hård krop; Line-thru; Paddle-tail; Rotte/mus; Robotstyret; Topwater-prop; Wake-bait; Andet
lt-LT: Plaukiančio masalo tipas: Riesta uodegėlė; Slystantis; Hibridinis kietas / minkštas; Nariuotų kietų dalių; Praveriamas; Plokščia uodegėlė; Žiurkė / pelė; Robotizuotas; Paviršinis su propeleriu; Bangas keliantis masalas; Kita
el: Στυλ κολύμβησης: Ουρά τύπου curly/curl; Τεχνητό δόλωμα glide bait; Υβριδικό σκληρό/μαλακό; Σπαστό σκληρό σώμα; Line-thru; Ουρά τύπου paddle; Αρουραίος/Ποντίκι; Ρομποτικό; Επιφανείας με έλικα; Τεχνητό δόλωμα wake bait; Άλλο
sk-SK: Štýl návnady: Kučeravý/točený chvostík; Kĺzavá návnada (Glide bait); Tvrdý/mäkký hybrid; Kĺbové tvrdé telo; Line-thru (prevliekacie); Kopytový chvostík (paddle tail); Potkan/myš; Robotická; Povrchová vrtuľka; Hladinový woblér (wake bait); Iný
hr-HR: Stil swimbaita: Kovrčavi rep; Klizeći mamac; Hibridni (tvrdo/mekano); Zglobno tvrdo tijelo; Provučena struna; Rep u obliku lopatice; Štakor/miš; Robotski; Površinski s propelerom; Površinski mamac (wake bait); Ostalo
nl: Swimbait stijl: Krulstaart; Glide bait; Hybride hard/zacht; Gelede hardbody; Line-thru; Schoepstaart; Rat/muis; Robotisch; Topwater prop; Wake bait; Overig
it: Stile dello swimbait: Coda a ricciolo; Glide bait; Ibrido rigido/morbido; Corpo rigido snodato; Line-thru; Coda a pala; Ratto/topo; Robotico; Topwater a elica; Wake bait; Altro
pt-BR: Swimbait estilo: Cauda enrolada/curva; Isca de deslizamento; Híbrido duro/macio; Corpo duro articulado; Linha direta; Cauda de remo; Rato/camundongo; Robótico; Isca de superfície; Isca de esteira; Outro
th: สไตล์เหยื่อปลอมแบบว่ายน้ำ: หางม้วน/โค้ง; เหยื่อไกลด์เบท; ไฮบริดแข็ง/นุ่ม; เหยื่อข้อต่อแบบแข็ง; ไลน์ทรู; แพดเดิลเทล; หนู; โรโบติก; ท็อปวอเตอร์พรอพ; เวคเบท; อื่นๆ
ru: Стиль свимбейта: С изогнутым хвостом; Глайдбейт; Гибридный (твердый/мягкий); Составной с твердым корпусом; Сквозной монтаж (Line-thru); С плоским хвостом (виброхвост); Крыса/мышь; Роботизированный; Поверхностный с пропеллером (пропбейт); Вейкбейт; Другое
de: Stil des Swimbaits: Sichelschwanz; Glide-Bait; Hybrid hart/weich; Gegliederter harter Körper; Line-Thru; Schaufelschwanz; Ratte/Maus; Robotisch; Topwater-Propeller; Wake-Bait; Sonstige
sv: Swimbait-stil: Curly tail; Glide bait; Hybrid hård/mjuk; Ledad hårdkropp; Line-thru; Paddeltail; Råtta/mus; Robotisk; Ytgående prop; Wake bait; Annan
nb: Swimbait-stil: Krøllhale; Glide-agn; Hybrid hard/myk; Leddet hard kropp; Line-thru; Padlehale; Rotte/mus; Robotisk; Overflatepropell; Wake-agn; Annet
zh-TW: 泳餌樣式: 捲尾; 滑行假餌; 軟硬混合; 多節硬餌; 穿線式; 槳尾; 老鼠造型; 機器電動; 水面螺旋槳; 尾流假餌; 其他